Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. County Boundaries
§ 18-1-102.
Range line explanation.

The range lines between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90), west of the sixth principal meridian referred to in W.S. 18-1-101(d), (g), (o) and (u) relate to the public surveys and embrace such offsets and correction lines east or west as such surveys have established.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 129, § 5; C.S. 1910, § 1040; C.S. 1920, § 1270; R.S. 1931, § 29-125; C.S. 1945, § 26-125; W.S. 1957, § 18-26; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Settlement of County Boundary Disputes,” V Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1970).